th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > การทำสวน > เครื่องมือทำสวน: เครื่องมือปลูกต้นไม้; เครื่องมือเพาะปลูก; ส้อมพรวนดิน; เคียวและมีดขนาดใหญ่สำหรับทำสวน; เกรียง; เครื่องพ่นสำหรับสนามหญ้าและสวน; ลูกกลิ้งสำหรับสนามหญ้า; กรรไกรตัดแต่งกิ่ง; เลื่อยตัดกิ่ง; กรรไกรตัดเล็มกิ่งไม้; คราด; พลั่วและจอบ; เครื่องหว่าน; รถเข็นล้อเดียว
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Trädgårdsskötsel > Trädgårdsverktyg: Lökplanteringsverktyg; Odlingsverktyg; Grepar; Trädgårdsskäror och -knivar; Planteringsspadar; Sprayflaskor för gräsmattor och trädgårdar; Vals för gräsmatta; Grensaxar; Grensågar; Trädgårdssaxar; Krattor; Spadar; Spridningsutrustning; Skottkärror
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Vrtnarjenje > Vrtno orodje: Orodja za sajenje čebulic; Orodja za obdelovanje zemlje; Vrtne vile; Vrtnarski srpi in mačete; Vrtne lopatice; Razpršilniki za trato in vrt; Valjčki za trato; Škarje za obrezovanje; Žage za obrezovanje; Škarje za obrezovanje; Grablje; Lopate in motike; Trosilniki; Samokolnice
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Hagearbeid > Hageverktøy: Verktøy for løkplanting; Kultiveringsverktøy; Hagegafler; Hagesigder og -macheter; Hagesparkler; Plen- og hagevannere; Plenruller; Gressakser; Beskjæringssager; Beskjæringssakser; Raker; Skuffer og spader; Spredere; Trillebårer
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Ogrodnictwo > Narzędzia ogrodnicze: Narzędzia do sadzenia cebulek; Narzędzia do uprawy roli; Widły ogrodowe; Sierpy i maczety ogrodnicze; Łopatki ogrodowe; Spryskiwacze ogrodowe; Walce do trawy; Nożyce do gałęzi; Piły ogrodnicze; Sekatory ogrodnicze; Grabie; Łopaty i szpadle; Roztrząsacze; Taczki
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Puutarhanhoito > Puutarhatyökalut: Istutuskairat; Puutarhavälineet; Talikot; Puutarhaveitset ja sirpit; Istutuslapiot; Nurmikko- ja puutarharuiskut; Nurmikkojyrät; Raivaussakset; Oksasahat; Oksasakset; Haravat; Lapiot ja kuokat; Levityskärryt; Kottikärryt
en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Gardening > Gardening Tools: Bulb Planting Tools; Cultivating Tools; Gardening Forks; Gardening Sickles & Machetes; Gardening Trowels; Lawn & Garden Sprayers; Lawn Rollers; Loppers; Pruning Saws; Pruning Shears; Rakes; Shovels & Spades; Spreaders; Wheelbarrows
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Vrtlarstvo > Vrtlarski alati: Alati za sadnju lukovica; Alati za uzgoj; Vrtlarske vile; Vrtlarski srpovi i mačete; Vrtlarske lopatice; Prskalice za travnjak i vrt; Valjci za travnjak; Škare za grane; Pile za obrezivanje; Škare za obrezivanje; Grablje; Lopate i ašovi; Posipači; Vrtna kolica
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Bahçecilik > Bahçe Aletleri: Çiçek Ekme Aletleri; Ekme Biçme Aletleri; Bahçe Tırmıkları; Bahçe Orakları ve Palaları; Küçük Bahçe Çapaları; Çimenlik ve Bahçe İlaçlama Pompaları; Çim Silindirleri; Dal makasları; Budama Testereleri; Budama Makasları; Tırmıklar; Kürekler ve Bahçıvan Belleri; Gübre Serpme Makineleri; El Arabaları
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Градинарство > Градински инструменти: Инструменти за засаждане на луковици; Инструменти за култивиране; Градински вили; Градински сърпове и мачетета; Градински мистрии; Пръскачки за морава и градина; Валяци за морави; Ножици за клони; Триони за подрязване; Ножици за подрязване; Гребла; Лопати и пики; Разпръсквачи; Ръчни колички
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kertészkedés > Kertészeti eszközök: Hagymaültetési eszközök; Művelőeszközök; Kertészeti villák; Kertészeti sarlók és macséták; Kertészeti simítók; Gyep- és kertpermetezők; Gyephengerek; Ágvágók; Metszőfűrészek; Metszőollók; Gereblyék; Lapátok és ásók; Szórók; Talicskák
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Jardinage > Outils de jardinage: Outils de plantation; Petit outillage de jardin; Fourches; Faucilles et machettes de jardinage; Transplantoir; Pulvérisateurs pour gazon et jardin; Rouleaux à gazon; Sécateurs; Scies à élaguer; Sécateurs; Râteaux; Pelles et bêches; Épandeurs; Brouettes
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Zahradničení > Zahradnické nářadí: Kolíky na sázení cibulek; Nářadí na obdělávání půdy; Rycí vidle; Zahradnické srpy a sekáčky; Zahradní lopatky; Postřikovače trávníků a zahrad; Travní válce; Nůžky na větve; Prořezávací pily; Zahradnické nůžky; Hrábě; Lopaty a rýče; Rozmetadla; Zahradní kolečka
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Havearbejde > Haveredskaber: Planteredskaber til planteløg; Kultivatorværktøj; Havegrebe; Segl og macheter til havebrug; Planteskeer; Plæne og have – sprayflasker; Havetromler; Beskæresakse; Beskæresave; Beskæresakse; River; Skovle og spader; Spredere; Trillebøre
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Jardinagem > Ferramentas de jardinagem: Ferramentas para plantar bolbos; Ferramentas de cultivo; Forquilhas de jardinagem; Foices e machetes para jardinagem; Pá de mão para jardinagem; Pulverizadores para relvado e jardim; Rolos para relvado; Podadores; Serras de poda; Tesouras de poda; Ancinhos; Pás curvas e planas; Semeadoras; Carrinhos de mão
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Jardinagem > Ferramentas de jardinagem: Ferramentas para plantio de bulbos; Ferramentas para cultivo; Forquilhas; Machetes e foices para jardinagem; Colher para jardinagem; Pulverizadores de gramado e jardim; Rolos de jardim; Tesouras de poda; Serras de poda; Tesouras de poda; Ancinhos; Pás; Espátulas para jardim; Carrinhos de mão
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Садоводство > Садовые инструменты: Инструменты для посадки луковиц; Инструменты для рыхления почвы; Вилы и посадочные вилки; Садовые серпы и мачете; Посадочные совки; Садовые опрыскиватели; Газонные катки; Секаторы; Садовые ножовки; Секаторы; Грабли; Лопаты; Сеялки; Тачки
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Sodininkystė > Sodo įrankiai: Svogūnėlių sodinimo įrankiai; Sodo įrankiai; Sodo šakės; Sodo pjautuvai ir mačetės; Sodo mentelės; Vejos ir sodo purkštuvai; Vejos volai; Genėjimo žirklės; Genėjimo pjūklai; Genėjimo žirklės; Grėbliai; Kastuvai ir semtuvai; Barstytuvai; Karučiai
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Articole pentru grădinărit > Scule de grădinărit: Plantator de bulbi; Scule cultivare; Furci grădinărit; Seceri și cuțite pentru grădinărit; Mistrii pentru grădinărit; Pulverizatoare pentru gazon și grădină; Tăvăluguri pentru gazon; Foarfeci pentru crengi groase; Emondoare; Foarfeci pentru emondare; Greble; Lopeți și hârlețe; Dispozitive de împrăștiere; Roabe
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Làm vườn > Dụng cụ làm vườn: Xẻng lấy đất; Dụng cụ trồng trọt; Chĩa làm vườn; Liềm và dao làm vườn; Bay làm vườn; Bình phun cỏ và làm vườn; Trục lăn cỏ; Kéo cắt cành; Cưa cắt cành; Kéo tỉa cây; Cào cỏ; Xẻng và mai; Máy rắc; Xe cút kít
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Giardinaggio > Attrezzi da giardinaggio: Strumenti per piantare bulbi; Attrezzi per coltivazione; Forconi; Falcetti e machete da giardinaggio; Trapiantatoi da giardinaggio; Spruzzatori da prato e giardino; Rulli per prati; cesoie; Seghetti da potatura; Forbici per potatura; Rastrelli; Pale e vanghe; Irrigatori; Carriole
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Tuinieren > Tuingereedschap: Bollenplanters; Ontginningsgereedschap; Hooivorken; Sikkels en kapmessen; Plantenschopjes; Tuin- en gazonsproeiers; Gazonrollers; Takkenscharen; Snoeizagen; Snoeischaren; Harken; Schoffels en spaden; Strooimachines; Kruiwagens
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > ガーデニング > ガーデニング用具: 球根植え器; 耕作用具; 園芸用フォーク; ガーデニング用鎌・ナタ; スコップ; 庭用散布機; 芝生鎮圧ローラー; ロッパー; 剪定のこぎり; 剪定ばさみ; レーキ; ショベル; ガーデンスプレッダー; 手押し車
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Gartenarbeit > Gartenwerkzeuge: Geräte zum Pflanzen von Knollen; Pflanzwerkzeuge; Mistgabeln; Gartensicheln & Macheten; Pflanzkellen; Rasen- & Gartenspritzgeräte; Rasenwalzen; Astscheren; Astsägen; Baumscheren; Rechen; Schaufeln & Spaten; Streugeräte; Schubkarren
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Jardinería > Herramientas de jardín: Herramientas para plantar bulbos; Herramientas de cultivo; Horcas de jardinería; Machetes y hoces de jardinería; Paletas de jardín; Pulverizadores de jardín y césped; Rodillos para césped; Tijeras de podar; Sierras de podar; Tijeras de podar; Rastrillos; Palas y picos; Esparcidores; Carretillas
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Záhradníctvo > Záhradné náradie: Nástroje na pestovanie cibuľovín; Kultivačné nástroje; Záhradné vidly; Záhradné kosáky a mačety; Presádzačky; Postrekovače na trávnik a záhradu; Valce na trávnik; Nožnice na konáre; Prerezávacie píly; Prerezávacie nožnice; Hrable; Lopaty a rýle; Rozmetače; Fúriky
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 园艺用品 > 园艺工具: 球茎种植工具; 农具; 园艺叉; 园艺镰刀/弯刀; 园艺铲; 草坪与花园喷雾器; 草坪滚筒; 修枝剪; 修剪锯; 修枝大剪刀; 犁耙; 铲子/铁锹; 施肥播种机; 手推车
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 園藝 > 園藝工具: 挖坑栽種工具; 農具; 園藝叉; 園藝鐮刀/彎刀; 花園小鏟; 草皮/花園噴灑器; 草坪滾壓器; 粗枝剪; 修枝鋸; 修草剪; 耙子; 鏟子; 撒播機; 手推車
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Κηπουρική > Εργαλεία κηπουρικής: Εργαλεία φύτευσης βολβών; Εργαλεία καλλιέργειας; Δίκρανα κηπουρικής; Δρεπάνια & μεγάλες μάχαιρες (μασέτες) κηπουρικής; Σπάτουλες κηπουρικής; Ψεκαστήρες γκαζόν & κήπου; Κύλινδροι περιποίησης χλοοτάπητα; Ψαλίδια κλαδέματος; Πριόνια κλαδέματος; Ψαλίδες κλαδέματος; Τσουγκράνες; Φτυάρια & σκαπάνες; Διανομείς; Καροτσάκια κηπουρικής
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 원예 > 원예 도구: 구근 파종 도구; 재배 도구; 원예용 갈퀴; 원예용 낫/마체테; 원예용 흙손; 잔디/정원 분무기; 잔디 롤러; 가지치기 가위; 전정톱; 전지 가위; 갈퀴; 삽/모종삽; 살포기; 손수레